Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Registration.

Sec. 08.48.010.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.011.
Board created.

There is created the State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors. The board shall administer the provisions of this chapter and comply with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The board consists of 11 members appointed by the governor having the qualifications as set out in AS

08.48.031

. The board consists of two civil engineers, two land surveyors, one mining engineer, one electrical or mechanical engineer, one engineer from another branch of the profession of engineering, two architects, one landscape architect, and one public member.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, if a mining engineer who qualifies for appointment to the board and is interested in serving on the board is not available, the governor may appoint a petroleum or chemical engineer to the seat designated for a mining engineer.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 11 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a transitional provision relating to the person holding a temporary position on the Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors before July 1, 2009, see § 3, ch. 23, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “11 members” for “10 members”, and in the second sentence, inserted “one landscape architect,” following “two architects,”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 31,
ch. 47, SLA 1998, as amended by sec. 2,
ch. 46, SLA 2001, sec. 2,
ch. 38, SLA 2005, and sec. 2,
ch. 23, SLA 2009, provides the following:

“TEMPORARY BOARD MEMBER. After considering recommendations made by the Alaska chapter of the American Society of Landscape Architects, the governor shall appoint a landscape architect to the Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors. The person appointed under this section

“(1)
must have been a resident in the state for three consecutive years immediately preceding appointment;

“(2) serves in an advisory, nonvoting capacity on the board;

“(3) is entitled to receive state money for per diem or travel expenses for work as a board member;

“(4) serves a term that expires June 30, 2017; and

“(5) must be registered as a landscape architect under
AS 08.48.”

Sec. 08.48.020.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.021.
Appointments and terms.

The governor shall give each member of the board a certificate of appointment, and the member shall file with the lieutenant governor a written oath or affirmation for faithful discharge of the member’s official duty.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

For purposes of determining appointments and terms under AS

08.01.035

, notwithstanding the reference in that section relating to eligibility for reappointment after serving a full or partial term,

a member who has served all of two successive terms on the board may not be reappointed to the board unless four years have elapsed since the person last served on the board; and

for purposes of (1) of this subsection, a person who serves for two years or more of a four-year term is considered to have served a full term.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1984; am § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For term of office, see AS

08.01.035

.

Sec. 08.48.030.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.031.
Qualifications.

Each member of the board must have been a resident in the state for three consecutive years immediately preceding appointment and, except for the public member, must be registered and have a minimum of five years of professional practice in the member’s respective field.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1975; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1984)

Sec. 08.48.040.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.48.041.
Removal of members.

The governor may remove a member of the board for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972)

Sec. 08.48.050.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.051.
Organization and meetings.

The board shall hold at least four regular meetings each year. Special meetings may be held as the bylaws of the board provide. The board shall elect or appoint annually from its members the following officers: chair, vice-chair, and secretary.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1997)

Sec. 08.48.055.
Executive secretary of the board; investigator.

The department, in consultation with the board, shall employ two persons who are not members of the board. One shall serve as the executive secretary of the board. The other shall serve as investigator for the board. The executive secretary is the principal executive officer of the board and is in the partially exempt service under AS

39.25.120

.

The executive secretary of the board shall perform duties as prescribed by the board.

The investigator employed under (a) of this section

shall conduct investigations into alleged violations of this chapter and into alleged violations of regulations and orders of the board;

shall, at the request of the board, conduct investigations based on complaints filed with the department or with the board; and

is directly responsible and accountable to the board, except that only the department has authority to terminate the investigator’s employment, and the department shall provide day-to-day and administrative supervision of the investigator.

History.

(§ 2 ch 66 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 2013)

Sec. 08.48.060.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.061.
Finances.

All money derived under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.

Each member of the board is entitled to receive per diem and travel expenses as authorized by law for other boards and commissions.

The board may make expenditures from appropriated funds for any purpose that is reasonably necessary for the proper performance of its duties under this chapter. This may include the expenses of the board delegates to meetings of councils of architect examiners, engineering examiners, land surveyor examiners, or landscape architect examiners, or any of their subdivisions. The total amount of disbursements issued in payment of the expenses incurred under this chapter may not exceed the amount of money appropriated by the legislature.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Sec. 08.48.070.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.071.
Records and reports.

The following record of the board’s proceedings and of all applications for registration or authorization shall be kept by the department under AS

08.01.050

:

the name, age, and last known address of each applicant;

the date of application;

the place of business of the applicant;

the education, experience, and other qualifications;

the type of examination required;

whether the applicant was rejected;

whether a certificate of registration or authorization was granted or endorsed;

the date of the action of the board;

other action taken by the board;

other information that may be considered necessary by the board.

The record of the board is prima facie evidence of the proceedings of the board, and a transcript, certified by the secretary, is admissible as evidence with the same effect as if the original were produced.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 19 SLA 1998.]

Board records and papers of the following class are of a confidential nature and are not public records: examination material for examinations not yet given, file records of examination problems, solutions, letters of inquiry and reference concerning applicants, board inquiry forms concerning applicants, investigation files if an investigation is still pending, and all other matters of a like confidential nature.

The department shall, under AS

08.01.050

, preserve the records under (a) of this section for the previous five years.

The department shall assemble statistics relating to the performance of its staff and the performance of the board, including

the number of architects, engineers, land surveyors, and landscape architects registered over a five-year period;

the rate of passage of examinations administered by the board;

the number of persons making application for registration as a professional architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect over a five-year period;

an account of registration fees collected under AS

08.01.065

;

a measure of the correspondence workload of any licensing examiner employed by the department to carry out this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 46 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1980; am §§ 7, 8 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 8 ch 36 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 1998; am §§
23 — 25 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1991, a reference to AS

08.01.065

in (f)(4) of this section was substituted for a reference to repealed AS

08.48.201(b)

to correct an error in ch. 37, SLA 1985.

In 1997, former paragraphs (c)(3)-(6) were renumbered as (c)(1)-(4), respectively, to reflect the 1997 repeal of former paragraphs (c)(1) and (2).

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in subsections (a), (e), and (f) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in subsections (a), (e), and (f) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education for professional land surveyors, see 12 AAC 36, art. 4.

For continuing education for professional architects, engineers, and landscape architects, see 12 AAC 36, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), (e), and (f), substituted “department” for “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;” in (a)(6) and (7), deleted “or not” following “whether”; in (f), deleted “but not limited to,” at the end of the introductory language.

Sec. 08.48.080.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.081.
Roster. [Repealed, § 9 ch 2 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 08.48.090.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.091.
Examinations.

Examinations shall be held at least once each year at places determined by the board. A candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 36 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.100.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.101.
Regulations; bylaws; code of ethics.

The board may adopt regulations to carry out the purpose of this chapter, including regulations

describing the contents of an examination;

establishing the conduct of an examination;

establishing a minimum score for passing an examination;

establishing bylaws governing its meetings and activities;

publishing a code of ethics or professional conduct for those persons regulated by this chapter, including corporations, limited liability companies, and limited liability partnerships under AS

08.48.241

;

establishing continuing education requirements for persons regulated by this chapter that must be completed before a certificate may be renewed; the continuing education requirements may not exceed standards established by a national accrediting body or other recognized professional organization.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 19 SLA 1998.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 36, art. 3.

For continuing education for professional land surveyors, see 12 AAC 36, art. 4.

For continuing education for professional architects, engineers, and landscape architects, see 12 AAC 36, art. 5.

Sec. 08.48.110.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.111.
Power to revoke, suspend, or reissue certificate.

The board may suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke the certificate of or reprimand a registrant, corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership who is found guilty of (1) fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate; (2) gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct in the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture; or (3) a violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or the code of ethics or professional conduct as adopted by the board. The code of ethics or professional conduct shall be distributed in writing to every registrant and applicant for registration under this chapter. This publication and distribution of the code of ethics or professional conduct constitutes due notice to all registrants. The board may revise and amend its code and, upon doing so, shall immediately notify each registrant in writing of the revisions or amendments. The board may, upon petition of the registrant, corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership, reissue a certificate if a majority of the members of the board vote in favor of the reissuance.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For other disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 36, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Revocation or suspension of license to practice architecture, 58 ALR3d 543.

Revocation or suspension of license of professional engineer, 64 ALR3d 509.

Sec. 08.48.120.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 27 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.48.121.
Disciplinary action and procedure.

Any person may file with the secretary of the board a charge of fraud, deceit, gross negligence, incompetence, misconduct, or violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under it, or the code of ethics of the board. The charge, constituting an accusation under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), shall be in writing and sworn to by the person making it.
A charge may be dismissed by the board as unfounded or trivial.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.48.111

and AS

08.01.075

.

Sec. 08.48.130.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.48.131.
Injunction.

The board may bring an action in the superior court to enforce compliance with this chapter or an order of the board or to enjoin a person from doing an act that violates this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of boards generally, see AS

08.01.075

.

Sec. 08.48.140.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.141.
Legal counsel.

The attorney general of the state shall act as legal advisor to the board and render legal assistance upon request of its chair.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 36 SLA 1997)

Secs. 08.48.150 — 08.48.170.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]